Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.440

Special meetings of voters—Directors to follow electors' decision.

It shall be the duty of every board of directors to carry out the directions of the electors of their districts as expressed at any such meeting.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.390. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 350 s 3; RRS s 5030; prior: 1897 c 118 s 158. Formerly RCW 28A.58.390, 28.58.390.]